Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
PART 2 STUDENT OBLIGATIONS AND INSTITUTIONAL LOANS
23-3.1-224. Contract powers of state-supported institutions of higher education - nonliability of state.

For the purpose of funding student obligations, the governing board of any state-supported institution of higher education is authorized to enter into contracts with the authority for the making or securing of student obligations and institutional loans, or the securing of authority bonds including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, contracts which require such institutions to pledge certain revenues, pay fees, advance or loan funds to the authority, establish and maintain reserves, and make, sell, or purchase student obligations.

For the purpose of making student obligations, the governing board of any state-supported institution of higher education is authorized to enter into contracts with the division for the origination, disbursement, servicing, or guarantee of any student obligation funded by an institutional loan.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize a state-supported institution of higher education to create a debt of the state within the meaning of the constitution or statutes of Colorado.

Any obligation incurred by any state-supported institution of higher education under the provisions of this part 2 shall not constitute or become an indebtedness, a debt, or a liability of the state, nor shall the state be liable on such obligations, nor shall such obligations constitute the giving, pledging, or loaning of the full faith and credit of the state. Such obligations shall not obligate the state or empower such institution, directly, indirectly, or contingently, to levy or collect any form of taxes or assessments, to create any indebtedness payable out of taxes or assessments, or to make any appropriation for their payment, and such appropriation, levy, or collection is prohibited.

The state shall not be liable in any event for the performance of any pledge, obligation, or agreement of any kind whatsoever which may be undertaken by such institutions. No breach of any such pledge, obligation, or agreement shall impose any pecuniary liability upon the state or any charge upon its general credit or against its taxing power.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire section added, p. 629, § 28, effective April 10.

L. 2004:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 573, § 23, effective July 1.

23-3.1-225. Confidentiality of records.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, all data, information, and records relating to the prepaid expense trust fund and the prepaid expense program are public records and are subject to inspection pursuant to the provisions of part 2 of article 72 of title 24, C.R.S.

The following data, information, and records relating to the prepaid expense trust fund and the prepaid expense program shall be kept confidential by the authority, and the authority shall deny the right of access to or inspection of such data, information, and records except as provided in subsection (3) of this section:

Data, information, and records relating to individual purchasers and qualified beneficiaries of advance payment contracts, including any records that reveal personally identifiable information about such individuals; except that the authority may disclose such information to an individual purchaser regarding his or her own contract;

Trade secrets and proprietary information regarding software, including programs and source codes, utilized or owned by the authority; and

Marketing plans and the results of market surveys conducted by the authority.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (2) of this section, the authority may disclose and may provide the right of access to or inspection of any data, information, or records to agents or representatives of professionals with whom the authority has contracted as provided in an advance payment contract or contracts, to the department of revenue, or to the state treasurer, or to other third parties if the purchaser or purchasers of the advance payment contract or contracts have consented in writing to such disclosure.

No cause of action shall arise against a person for disclosing confidential information in violation of subsection (2) of this section unless the act or omission giving rise to the cause of action was intentional or grossly negligent.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire section added, p. 212, § 2, effective August 5.

L. 2000:

Entire section R&RE, p. 221, § 1, effective March 29.

L. 2004:

(3) amended, p. 573, § 24, effective July 1.

23-3.1-226. Policies for promotion and disclosure of program information.

The authority shall design a policy related to the promotion of the prepaid expense program and a policy related to the disclosure of program-related information to purchasers or qualified beneficiaries in a manner consistent with this part 2 and consistent with the requirements of section 529 of the internal revenue code in order to require that:

Appropriate promotional material and program-related information disclose the average tuition increase in state institutions of higher education in Colorado, as defined in section 23-3.3-101 (4), over the previous five years;

Annual statements to purchasers or qualified beneficiaries disclose the number of tuition units paid for, the payments made for such tuition units, and the current value of such tuition units, as well as the average tuition increases in state institutions of higher education in Colorado, as defined in section 23-3.3-101 (4), over the five previous years;

An annual report to each purchaser of an advance payment contract setting forth the value and rate of return on the advance payment contract based on a calculation of average tuition and setting forth the amount of the stabilization reserve and retained earnings in the prepaid expense program. The report shall be provided at least annually and upon request of the purchaser of the advance payment contract.

Promotional material and program-related information disclose that no moneys invested in the prepaid expense program are insured by the state of Colorado and that neither the principal deposited nor the investment returned is guaranteed by the state of Colorado. Such material and information shall also disclose the existence of a stabilization reserve to better support its liability.

Any fees paid from moneys collected pursuant to this part 2 are disclosed in promotional material and program-related information provided to the public and to purchasers or qualified beneficiaries, including disclosure of amounts assessed for payments over time.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire section added, p. 1286, § 15, effective May 26.